sk-SK: Nastaviteľné košíčkové tlmiče: Nastaviteľný klobúčik (skrutka); Nastaviteľný klobúčik (posuvný); Pevný klobúčik; Vrátane vymeniteľných klobúčikov; Odnímateľný klobúčik (možnosť zmeniť na rovné dusítko); Iné
zh-TW: 可調式杯形消音器: 可調式杯狀弱音器 (螺絲); 可調式杯狀弱音器 (滑動); 固定式杯狀弱音器; 含可替換杯口; 可拆式杯狀弱音器 (可轉換為直式弱音器); 其他
en: Adjustable cup mutes: Adjustable cup (screw); Adjustable cup (sliding); Fixed cup; Interchangeable cups included; Removable cup (convertible to straight mute); Other
es: Sordina de copa ajustable: Copa ajustable (tornillo); Copa ajustable (deslizante); Copa fija; Copas intercambiables incluidas; Copa extraíble (convertible a sordina recta); Otro
nb: Justerbare koppdempere: Justerbar cup (skrue); Justerbar cup (glidende); Fast cup; Utskiftbare cuper inkludert; Avtakbar cup (kan konverteres til straight mute); Annet
vi: Cốc giảm âm có thể điều chỉnh: Cốc có thể điều chỉnh (ốc vít); Cốc có thể điều chỉnh (trượt); Cốc cố định; Bao gồm cốc có thể thay thế; Cốc có thể tháo rời (chuyển đổi thành giảm âm thẳng); Khác
nl: Verstelbare cupdempers: Verstelbare beker (schroef); Verstelbare beker (schuif); Vaste beker; Verwisselbare bekers inbegrepen; Verwijderbare beker (om te bouwen naar straight mute); Overig
da: Justerbare kopdæmpere: Justerbar cup (skrue); Justerbar cup (glidende); Fast cup; Udskiftelige cups medfølger; Aftagelig cup (kan konverteres til straight mute); Anden
hu: Állítható csészetompítók: Állítható kehely (csavaros); Állítható kehely (csúszó); Rögzített kehely; Cserélhető kelyhek mellékelve; Kivehető kehely (egyenes szordínóvá alakítható); Egyéb
pt-BR: Silenciadores ajustáveis para copos: Copo ajustável (parafuso); Copo ajustável (deslizante); Copo fixo; Copos intercambiáveis incluídos; Copo removível (conversível para surdina reta); Outros
lt-LT: Reguliuojami pučiamųjų instrumentų garso slopintuvai: Reguliuojama taurė (varžtas); Reguliuojama taurė (slankiojanti); Fiksuota taurė; Pridedamos keičiamos taurės; Nuimama taurė (keičiama į tiesiąją surdiną); Kita
bg-BG: Регулируеми заглушители тип „чаша“: Регулируема чашка (винт); Регулируема чашка (плъзгаща се); Фиксирана чашка; Включени сменяеми чашки; Сваляща се чашка (превръща се в права сурдинка); Други
pt-PT: Surdinas de copo ajustáveis: Copo ajustável (parafuso); Copo ajustável (deslizante); Copo fixo; Copos intercambiáveis incluídos; Copo amovível (conversível para surdina reta); Outro
ja: 調節可能なカップミュート: 調整可能カップ (ネジ式); 調整可能カップ (スライド式); 固定カップ; 交換可能なカップ付き; 取り外し可能カップ (ストレートミュートに変換可能); その他
hr-HR: Prilagodljivi prigušivači za instrumente: Prilagodljiva čašica (vijak); Prilagodljiva čašica (klizna); Fiksna čašica; Uključene izmjenjive čašice; Odvojiva čašica (može se pretvoriti u ravni prigušivač); Ostalo
de: Verstellbarer Cup-Dämpfer: Verstellbarer Cup (Schraube); Verstellbarer Cup (schiebbar); Fester Cup; Inklusive austauschbaren Cups; Abnehmbarer Cup (umwandelbar in Straight-Dämpfer); Andere
tr: Ayarlanabilir cup susturucuları: Ayarlanabilir kupa (vidalı); Ayarlanabilir kupa (sürgülü); Sabit kupa; Değiştirilebilir kupalar dahil; Çıkarılabilir kupa (düz susturucuya dönüştürülebilir); Diğer
th: ที่ปิดเสียงแบบถ้วยที่ปรับระดับได้: คัพมิวต์แบบปรับได้ (สกรู); คัพมิวต์แบบปรับได้ (สไลด์); คัพมิวต์แบบคงที่; รวมคัพที่เปลี่ยนสลับได้; คัพแบบถอดออกได้ (ปรับเป็นสเตรทมิวต์ได้); อื่นๆ
fi: Säädettävät kupinvaimentimet: Säädettävä kuppi (ruuvi); Säädettävä kuppi (liuku); Kiinteä kuppi; Vaihdettavat kupit mukana; Irrotettava kuppi (muunnettavissa suoraksi sordiinoksi); Muu
ru: Регулируемые чашечные демпферы: Регулируемая чашка (на винте); Регулируемая чашка (скользящая); Фиксированная чашка; Сменные чашки в комплекте; Съемная чашка (трансформируется в сурдину straight); Другое
sl-SI: Nastavljivi dušilci za trobente: Nastavljiva skodelica (vijak); Nastavljiva skodelica (drsno); Fiksna skodelica; Vključene zamenljive skodelice; Odstranljiva skodelica (pretvori se v ravni dušilec); Drugo
el: Ρυθμιζόμενες σουρντίνες τύπου κυπέλλου: Ρυθμιζόμενη κούπα (βιδωτή); Ρυθμιζόμενη κούπα (συρόμενη); Σταθερή κούπα; Περιλαμβάνονται εναλλάξιμες κούπες; Αφαιρούμενη κούπα (μετατρέπεται σε ίσια σουρντίνα); Άλλο
pl: Regulowane tłumiki cup: Regulowany kubek (śruba); Regulowany kubek (suwak); Stały kubek; Wymienne kubki w zestawie; Zdejmowany kubek (możliwość zmiany na tłumik prosty); Inne
sv: Justerbara ljuddämpare: Justerbar cup-sordin (skruv); Justerbar cup-sordin (glidande); Fast cup-sordin; Utbytbara cups ingår; Avtagbar cup (konverterbar till rak sordin); Övrigt
it: Sordina regolabile per la coppa: Tazza regolabile (vite); Tazza regolabile (a scorrimento); Tazza fissa; Tazze intercambiabili incluse; Tazza rimovibile (convertibile in sordina straight); Altro
zh-CN: 可调节杯型弱音器: 可调杯（螺丝式）; 可调杯（滑动式）; 固定杯; 包含可互换杯; 可拆卸杯（可转换为直弱音器）; 其他
cs: Nastavitelné kalíškové dusítko: Nastavitelný klobouček (šroub); Nastavitelný klobouček (posuvný); Pevný klobouček; Včetně vyměnitelných kloboučků; Odnímatelný klobouček (lze přeměnit na rovné dusítko); Ostatní
fr: Sourdines à bol réglable: Bol réglable (à vis); Bol réglable (coulissant); Bol fixe; Bols interchangeables inclus; Bol amovible (convertible en sourdine sèche); Autre
ko: 조절식 컵 약음기: 조절식 컵(나사형); 조절식 컵(슬라이딩형); 고정식 컵; 교체형 컵 포함; 분리형 컵(스트레이트 뮤트로 전환 가능); 기타
ro-RO: Surdine reglabile în formă de cupă: Cupa ajustabilă (șurub); Cupa ajustabilă (glisantă); Cupa fixă; Cupe interschimbabile incluse; Cupa detașabilă (convertibilă în surdină dreaptă); Altele